Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 5. Alaska Clean Water Fund and Drinking Water Fund Bonds.

Cross references. —

For legislative policy and purposes relating to revenue bonds authorized by ch. 141, SLA 1996, see § 1, ch. 141, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 37.15.560.
Bond authorization.

For purposes of providing part of the money to be used to provide financial assistance to municipalities and other qualified entities under AS

46.03.032

and

46.03.036

, including the costs of bond issuance and administration, the issuance and sale of revenue bonds of the state is authorized subject to (b) of this section. The bonds are to be issued by the state bond committee, as provided in AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, as part of the Alaska clean water fund and the Alaska drinking water fund revolving loan fund programs (AS

46.03.032

and

46.03.036

), public enterprises of the state. The net proceeds of the sale of the bonds remaining after any payment of costs of issuance and administration shall be paid into the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, as appropriate. Accrued interest paid on the bonds shall be paid into the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund for transfer to the Alaska clean water fund revenue bond redemption fund or the Alaska drinking water fund revenue bond redemption fund (AS

37.15.565

), as appropriate.

The state bond committee may not issue more than $15,000,000 in revenue bonds under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

during a fiscal year for each revolving loan fund program referred to in (a) of this section, excluding refunding bonds. The total unpaid principal amount of revenue bonds, including refunding bonds, but excluding refunded bonds, issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

may not exceed $150,000,000 for each program.

The bonds do not constitute a general obligation of the state. Authorization by the voters of the state or the legislature is not required.

The state bond committee may enter into agreements with other state agencies as necessary or convenient to implement AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

.

The state bond committee may contract for the services of underwriters, paying agents, trustees, bond printers, rating agencies, bond insurance, credit enhancement providers, accountants, financial advisors, and bond counsel, and other services as are necessary to accomplish the bond issuance and sale.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.565.
Bond redemption funds.

There are established special funds of the state, known as the “Alaska clean water fund revenue bond redemption fund ” and the “Alaska drinking water fund revenue bond redemption fund,” which are trust funds for paying and securing the payment of the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds and which shall be at all times completely segregated and set apart from all other funds of the state. The committee, on behalf of the state, may obligate and bind the state to set aside and pay into the bond redemption funds, on a monthly or other periodic basis, any part or parts of, or all of, or a fixed proportion of, or a fixed amount of the money in the Alaska clean water fund (AS

46.03.032

) or the Alaska drinking water fund (AS

46.03.036

) sufficient to pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds and, if it considers it necessary, to set aside and maintain reserves for this purpose. The bond redemption funds shall be drawn upon only for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, together with related trustee fees, if any.

Money in the bond redemption funds may be invested in the same manner and on the same conditions as permitted for investment of money belonging to the state or held in the treasury under AS

37.10.070

; however, the committee may agree with the bondholders to further limit these investments. Earnings on investments must be retained in the bond redemption funds.

Separate accounts may be created in the bond redemption funds for the purposes of paying and securing the bonds. The accounts may be combined for purposes of investment and for financial support to achieve the purposes of AS

37.15.570(c)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.570.
Bond terms.

The bonds may be issued and sold at public or negotiated sale in the manner, in the amounts or series, and at the time or times that the committee determines. The bonds, or each series of them, shall be sold at the price and upon the terms, conditions, and covenants set by the committee after considering market conditions. Interest rates may be fixed or variable.

The bonds mature at the time or times fixed by the committee. The bonds may be subject to redemption before their fixed maturities, as determined by the committee, with or without a premium or premiums. The bonds may be in denominations determined by the committee; may be issued in fully or partially registered form; must be payable as to principal and interest at the place or places determined by the committee; must be signed on behalf of the state in the manner provided by the committee; must be issued under and subject to the terms, conditions, covenants, and protective features safeguarding payment of the bonds and relating to the funding of projects as found necessary by the committee, including covenants requiring the setting aside and maintenance of certain reserves to secure the payment of principal and interest, all under regulations and conditions of the committee.

The committee may pledge to the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the committee part or all of the legally available money or other assets on hand in the Alaska clean water fund (AS

46.03.032

) or the Alaska drinking water fund (AS

46.03.036

); part or all of the revenue of the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, including federal capitalization grants, the proceeds of loan repayments, and interest on money in the funds; the proceeds of the sale of bonds; and money on hand in the bond redemption funds. Revenue of the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, if so pledged, must be paid into the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, as appropriate. The committee may provide for the issuance of additional bonds, secured by a pledge of such money and revenue, ranking junior to, senior to, or on a parity with, outstanding bonds, upon conditions prescribed in the bond resolution. A pledge of loan repayments securing bonds may be made applicable to specific loans from the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, or, on a pooled basis, to all loan repayments received.

If the committee finds it reasonably necessary, the committee may select a trustee or trustees for the holders of the bonds, or any series of them, for the safeguarding and disbursement of any of the money in the bond redemption funds created by AS

37.15.565

, or for duties with respect to the enforcement, authentication, delivery, payment, and registration of the bonds as the committee may determine. The committee shall fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee or trustees.

In its determination of all matters and questions relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds and the fixing of their maturities, terms, conditions, and covenants as provided in (a) — (d) of this section, the decisions of the committee shall be those that are reasonably necessary for the best interests of the state and its inhabitants and that will accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds, with due regard, however, for the continued funding under AS

46.03.032

and AS

46.03.036

of the categories of projects identified in AS

46.03.032

(d) and

46.03.036

(b). Decisions of the committee, as expressed in a bond resolution, are final and are conclusively considered to comply with the requirements of AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, AS 46.03.032, and 46.03.036.

A bond resolution may provide that the bonds issued must contain a recital that they are issued under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and under AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate, and a bond containing this recital is conclusively considered to be valid and to have been issued in conformity with AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and with AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.573.
Bond resolution.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds by adopting a resolution and shall prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or any part or series of them. The bond resolution must fix the principal amount, denominations, date, maturities, manner of sale, place or places of payment, rights of redemption, if any, terms, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds or each series of them. A bond resolution may state terms, conditions, amounts, and other limitations on loans to be made from the Alaska clean water fund (AS

46.03.032

) or the Alaska drinking water fund (AS

46.03.036

), as appropriate, from the relevant bond proceeds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.575.
State aid intercept.

If a municipality is in default on the payment of principal or interest on a loan from the Alaska clean water fund (AS

46.03.032

) or the Alaska drinking water fund (AS

46.03.036

), the committee may provide written notice of default to any state agency that is the custodian of money that is payable to the municipality. If the committee determines to provide notice, a separate written notice shall be given in each instance of default. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at any time after receipt of written notice of default, the agency head shall withhold payment of the money from the municipality. The agency head shall pay over the withheld money to the committee for deposit in the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, as appropriate, for the purpose of paying or securing the principal and interest on the loan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 9 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska drinking water fund, see 18 AAC 76, art. 2.

Sec. 37.15.580.
Pledge of the state.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds issued by the committee under AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and under AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate, that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the committee by AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and by AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate, to fulfill the terms of any contract made by the committee with the holders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the principal amount of the bonds, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, are fully met and discharged. The committee may include this pledge and agreement of the state in a contract with the holders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.583.
Enforcement by bond owner.

The owner or owners of not less than 10 percent of the aggregate principal amount of any series or issue of bonds or the trustee for the owners of the bonds or any series of them may, by appropriate proceedings in state court, require and compel the transfer, setting aside, and payment of money and the enforcement of all of the terms, conditions, and covenants as required and provided in AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate, and the bond resolution.

A proceeding under (a) of this section may be commenced and conducted only in the Superior Court for the State of Alaska, First Judicial District at Juneau.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsection (b) on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 3, see sec. 13, ch. 141, SLA 1996, and secs. 24 and 26, ch. 61, SLA 2000, in the 1996 and 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 37.15.585.
Amounts required for payments.

The committee shall, before June 30 of each year or from time to time within the year, as appropriate, commencing with the year in which the bonds are issued, certify to the commissioners of revenue and environmental conservation the amounts required in the current fiscal year and the next ensuing fiscal year by the bond resolution or resolutions to be paid out of the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund into the appropriate bond redemption fund and to be paid into and maintained in any reserve fund or account or other fund or account created by the bond resolution or resolutions, and shall also certify to the commissioners the last date or dates upon which payments may be made.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.587.
Purposes and sufficiency of revenue.

The proceeds of bonds may be used for the purposes described in AS

46.03.032

or

46.03.036

, as appropriate. Bonds may not be issued unless the committee first finds that revenue to be derived from repayment of loans from the Alaska clean water fund or the Alaska drinking water fund, as appropriate, will be sufficient, together with other available money, to comply with all covenants of the bond resolutions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 13 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.590.
Refunding.

The committee may refund the bonds or any part of them at or before their maturities or redemption dates by the issuance of refunding revenue bonds of the state if, in the opinion of the committee, refunding is advantageous to and in the best interest of the state and its inhabitants.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by the voters of the state or by an act of the legislature. The committee shall adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, exchange or sale, and delivery of the refunding bonds. All provisions of AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

and of AS

46.03.032

and

46.03.036

, as appropriate, applicable to revenue bonds are applicable to the refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of them, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide money for the advance or current refunding of all bonds to be refunded and interest on the refunded bonds and, in addition, for the payment of all costs of issuance and administration of the refunding bonds. These expenses also include the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold; the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on them to date of the call or retirement; and other such costs. The committee is authorized to incur such expenses.

The committee may contract with a refunding trustee to hold the proceeds of refunding bonds in trust until the proceeds, together with earnings on the proceeds, are applied to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds to be refunded. Until the refunding bond proceeds are applied, the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States or an agency or corporation of the United States whose obligations constitute direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by the United States.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.15.595.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds are legal investments for all banks, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. The bonds may be accepted as security for deposits of all money of the state and its political subdivisions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996)

Sec. 37.15.600.
Statutory construction.

AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the purposes for which they were enacted.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996)

Sec. 37.15.603.
Regulations.

The committee may adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996)

Sec. 37.15.605.
Definitions.

In AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

,

“bond redemption funds” means the Alaska clean water fund revenue bond redemption fund and the Alaska drinking water fund revenue bond redemption fund established in AS

37.15.565

, as applicable;

“bond resolution” means the resolution or resolutions adopted by the committee under AS

37.15.573

authorizing the issuance of bonds;

“bonds” means the Alaska clean water fund revenue bonds or the Alaska drinking water fund revenue bonds authorized in AS

37.15.560

—

37.15.605

, as applicable;

“commissioner of environmental conservation” means the principal executive officer the Department of Environmental Conservation as provided in AS

44.46.010

, or a successor;

“commissioner of revenue” means the principal executive officer of the Department of Revenue as provided in AS

44.25.010

, or a successor;

“committee” means the state bond committee created in AS

37.15.110

or any other committee, body, department, or officer of the state that succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the state bond committee by lawful act of the legislature;

“costs of issuance and administration” means all costs associated with issuance and administration of Alaska clean water fund revenue bonds or the Alaska drinking water fund revenue bonds, as applicable, and refunding bonds, including costs of bond printing, official statements, financial advisors, travel costs, rating agencies, bond insurance, letters and lines of credit for credit enhancement, underwriters, legal services, paying agents, bonds registrars, bond and escrow trustees, arbitrage rebate, and all other costs, including administrative costs, both direct and indirect.

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1996; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 61 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, paragraph (4) was renumbered as (5) and paragraph (5) was renumbered as (4) to maintain alphabetical order.